Arkansas, session 2025, HB1373.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 25, Chapter 43, Subchapter 3, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
25-43-306. Encouragement of award of workforce development funding to
individuals starting new businesses and businesses established within the
previous five (5) years.
The Department of Commerce shall encourage that at least five percent
(5%) of workforce development funding, including without limitation funding
allocated by workforce development boards across the state, go towards
supporting organizations or programs:
(1) For individuals starting new businesses in the state; or
(2) That provide services to businesses established within the
previous five (5) years whose principal place of business is in this state.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. TEMPORARY LANGUAGE. This act is effective
*MBM107*
01/31/2025 2:59:19 PM MBM107

HB1373
on and after January 1, 2027.



































01/31/2025 2:59:19 PM MBM107